Wisconsin, session 2025, SB905.
do enact as follows:SB905,13Section 1. Corrections of obvious nonsubstantive errors under s. 435.17 (2), stats. In the sections of the statutes listed in Column A, the text shown 5in Column B was changed to the text shown in column C to correct obvious 6nonsubstantive errors under s. 35.17 (2) of the statutes:Note: Confirms correction of obvious nonsubstantive errors in the statutes under s. 35.17 (2). - See PDF for table SB905,2,11